el: Στυλ διχτυού μαλλιών: Σκούφος (Bouffant); Διχτάκι κότσου; Προστατευτικός σκούφος; Φιλέ; Άλλο
de: Stil des Haarnetzes: Bouffant-Haube; Duttnetz; Schutzhaube; Snood-Haarnetz; Sonstige
nb: Hårnettstil: Bouffant; Knutenett; Beskyttelseshette; Snood; Annet
hr-HR: Stil s mrežicom za kosu: Bouffant kapa; Mrežica za punđu; Zaštitna kapa; Snood mrežica; Ostalo
cs: Styl síťky na vlasy: Nadýchaná (Bouffant); Síťka na drdol; Ochranná čepice; Síťka (Snood); Jiný
fr: Style de filet à cheveux: Bouffant; Filet à chignon; Bonnet de protection; Résille; Autre
sv: Hårnätsstil: Bouffant; Knutnät; Skyddsmössa; Snood; Övrigt
en: Hair net style: Bouffant; Bun cover; Protective cap; Snood; Other
vi: Kiểu lưới tóc: Mũ phồng; Bọc búi tóc; Mũ bảo hộ; Mũ lưới; Khác
es: Estilo de red para el cabello: Estilo bouffant; Cubre moño; Gorro protector; Redecilla; Otro
zh-TW: 髮網樣式: 蓬鬆帽; 包頭網; 防護帽; 髮網套; 其他
ru: Тип сетки для волос: Шапочка-шарлотта; Сеточка для пучка; Защитная шапочка; Снуд; Другое
ko: 헤어 네트 스타일: 부팡; 번 커버; 보호 캡; 스누드; 기타
it: Tipo di retina per capelli: Bouffant; Coprichignon; Cuffia protettiva; Retina; Altro
nl: Haarnetje stijl: Bouffant; Knotjesnet; Beschermkap; Haarnet (snood); Overig
sk-SK: Štýl sieťky na vlasy: Bouffant; Sieťka na drdol; Ochranná čiapka; Sieťka na vlasy; Iné
sl-SI: Stil mrežice za lase: Nabreknjena mrežica; Mrežica za figo; Zaščitna kapa; Mrežica za lase; Drugo
lt-LT: Plaukų tinklelio stilius: Pūstas tinklelis („Bouffant“); Kuodo tinklelis; Apsauginė kepuraitė; Plaukų tinklelis („Snood“); Kita
pt-PT: estilo de rede de cabelo: Bouffant; Rede para coque; Touca protetora; Snood; Outro
hu: Hajháló stílusa: Hajháló (Bouffant); Kontyháló; Védősapka; Hálós sapka (Snood); Egyéb
tr: Saç filesi stili: Kabarık; Topuz bonesi; Koruyucu bone; Saç filesi; Diğer
da: Hårnetsstil: Bouffant; Knoldnet; Beskyttelseshætte; Snood; Andet
fi: Hiusverkon tyyli: Puhvi; Nutturaverkko; Suojamyssy; Hiusverkko; Muu
pl: Styl siatki na włosy: Czepek okrągły typu bouffant; Siatka na kok; Czepek ochronny; Siatka snood; Inne
pt-BR: Rede de cabelo estilo: Touca bouffant; Rede para coque; Touca protetora; Rede de cabelo (snood); Outro
ro-RO: Stilul plasei de păr: Bufant; Plăsuță pentru coc; Cască de protecție; Plasă de păr snood; Altele
th: รูปแบบตาข่ายคลุมผม: หมวกคลุมผมทรงพอง; ตาข่ายคลุมผมมวย; หมวกคลุมผมป้องกัน; สนูด; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Стил на мрежата за коса: Буфан (шапка); Мрежа за кок; Предпазна шапка; Снуд; Други
ja: ヘアネットスタイル: ブーファン; お団子カバー; 保護キャップ; スヌード; その他
zh-CN: 发网造型: 蓬松发帽; 发髻罩; 防护帽; 粗线发网; 其他